Massachusetts, session 194th, S3193.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 278 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 35 the 
following sections: 
Section 36. (a) A civil action cannot be maintained against any person, firm or 
corporation, for the publication of a fair and true report of  any judicial proceeding, legislative 
proceeding or other official proceeding, or for any heading of the report which is  a  fair  and  
true  headnote of the statement published. 
(b) This section shall not apply to a libel contained in any other matter added by any 
person concerned in the publication or in the report of anything said or done at the time and place 
of such a proceeding which was not a part thereof. 
(c) A communication made by an individual, without malice, regarding an incident of 
sexual assault, harassment, or discrimination shall be deemed privileged. 

of 2 12  (d) A prevailing defendant in any defamation action brought against such defendant for 
making a communication that is privileged under subsection (a)  of this section shall be entitled 
to their reasonable attorney's fees and costs for successfully defending themselves in  such 
litigation, plus treble damages for any harm caused to them by the defamation action against 
them, in addition to punitive damages available or any other relief otherwise permitted by law. 
(e) This section shall only apply to an individual that has, or at any time had, a reasonable 
basis to file a complaint of sexual assault, harassment, or discrimination, whether the complaint 
is, or was, filed or not. 
(f) The following, as used in this chapter, unless the text otherwise requires or a different 
meaning is specifically required, shall mean— 
"Communication," factual  information related to an incident of sexual assault, 
harassment, or discrimination experienced by the individual making  the  communication, 
including, but not limited to, any of the following: i) an act of sexual assault; ii) an act of sexual 
harassment; iii)  an  act  of  workplace  harassment  or discrimination, failure to prevent an act of 
workplace harassment or discrimination, aiding,  abetting,  inciting,  compelling, or coercing an 
act of workplace harassment or discrimination, or an act of retaliation against a person for 
reporting or opposing workplace harassment or discrimination; or iv) an act of harassment or 
discrimination, or an act  of  retaliation against  a  person  for  reporting  harassment or 
discrimination, by the owner of a housing accommodation.